Hawaii statutes.
§412:2-106 Public or private hearings. (a)
All hearings before the commissioner shall be subject to chapter 91 and the
rules adopted pursuant thereto, unless it is expressly provided otherwise in
this chapter.

(b) All actions of and proceedings before the
commissioner under parts III, IV, V and VI of this article shall be closed to
the public. In such proceedings, reports of examination, testimony of
examiners and other evidence may be presented to substantiate or refute
allegations stated in any notice of charges. Except as otherwise provided by
law, no person shall divulge information regarding such actions or proceedings
except to governmental authorities, to the person's directors, and to its
officers, employees, attorneys, auditors, or other consultants or advisors of
the person who have responsibilities related to the action or proceeding.
Hearings which result from joint supervisory or enforcement actions with an
appropriate federal regulatory agency shall be closed to the public, unless the
procedures set forth in this section are preempted by federal law.

(c) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this
section, the commissioner may authorize the disclosure of the existence or
outcome of an action or proceeding under parts III, IV, V and VI of this
article and may disclose other general information concerning the action or
proceeding, if the commissioner shall determine that such disclosure is in the
public interest. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next